Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB218.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 132 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of this section, "local taxing authority" means a city, county,
charter county, consolidated local government, urban-county government,
unified local government, special purpose governmental entity, or school district.
(2) The Department of Revenue shall ensure that all taxpayers can access financial
information, as set out in subsection (3) of this section, for each local taxing
authority in the state.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall include a link on the main property tax page of
its website that shall direct taxpayers to financial information for each taxing
authority and shall include:
(a) A link to the most recent Kentucky Property Tax Rates publication and the
rates assessed; and
(b) Financial information for each local taxing authority that includes:
1. For a local government that creates a uniform financial information
report, the information set out in subsection (3) of Section 2 of this
Act;
2. For a special purpose governmental entity, a link to the online
reporting portal maintained by the Department for Local Government
as set out in KRS 65A.020; and
3. For a school district, a link to the page maintained by Kentucky
Department of Education on its website that contains fund balance
and revenue and expenditure information for school districts.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 65.900 TO 65.925 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 3
BR086000.100 - 860 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 860
(1) Each local government that maintains a notice website as defined in KRS 424.145
or a website maintained by the local government that meets the requirements of a
notice website, shall publish its uniform financial information report on its
website with a conspicuous link or heading directing the public to the report
within thirty (30) days following the completion of the report and shall maintain
the report in accordance with the requirements set out in KRS 424.145(5)(b)3.
(2) Each local government that does not maintain a notice website as defined in KRS
424.145 or a website maintained by the local government that meets the
requirements of a notice website, shall forward a copy of its uniform financial
information report to a county library of the county in which the local
government is located within thirty (30) days following the completion of the
report. The county library shall make the report available to members of the
public upon request.
(3) Before January 1, 2026, each local government shall provide to the Department
of Revenue information regarding where the public may access its uniform
financial information report. If the local government publishes the report
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it shall provide the Department of
Revenue with the Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the website where the
report has been published. If the local government forwards the report pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section, it shall provide the Department of Revenue with
the address of the county library in which the report shall be made available to
the public.
(4) Each local government shall, in the first advertisement in a newspaper or
alternative publication that it makes pursuant to KRS 424.145 after January 1,
2026, include with that advertisement or publication a statement that the public
can access information regarding the local government's tax rates and finances
on the Kentucky Department of Revenue's website.
Page 2 of 3
BR086000.100 - 860 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 860
Section 3. The Kentucky General Assembly hereby recognizes and affirms that
taxpayers are entitled to transparency regarding the use of their tax dollars, and to that
end advances this measure to provide access to resources regarding the finances of local
taxing authorities in a single place.
Page 3 of 3
BR086000.100 - 860 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:52 PM Jacketed